Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-109] Financial management.
(a) The board shall select a custodial trustee to collect, receive, hold, or
disburse moneys payable to or by the company.

(b) The board shall invest the company's
principal and income without distinction between principal and income and keep
the company's assets invested in real or personal property or other
securities. The board may retain cash temporarily awaiting investment or to
meet contemplated payments without liability for interest thereon.

(c) The board shall manage the company's
assets, except to the extent that the authority to manage the company's assets
is delegated to other qualified investment managers. The board may appoint
investment managers to manage, acquire, or dispose of any of the company's
assets. An investment manager may be designated as an "investment
agent". The investment manager shall acknowledge in writing that he or
she is a fiduciary under the company.

(d) The board may:

(1) Sell the company's securities. No purchaser of
the company's securities is bound to see to the application of the purchase
money or inquire as to the validity of such sale;

(2) Vote on behalf of any stocks, bonds, or
securities of any corporation or issuer held in the company or request any
action to such corporation or issuer. The board may give general or special
proxies or powers of attorney with or without powers of substitution;

(3) Participate in reorganizations, recapitalization,
consolidations, mergers, and similar transactions for stocks, bonds, or other
securities of any corporation that are held by the company, and accept and
retain any property received thereunder for the company;

(4) Exercise any subscription rights and conversion
privileges for the company's stocks or securities;

(5) Compromise, compound, and settle any debt or
obligation due to or from the company; reduce the amount of principal and
interest, damages, and costs of collection in settling such debts;

(6) Cause securities held by it to be registered in
its own name or in the name of a nominee without indicating that the securities
are held in a fiduciary capacity and to hold any securities in bearer form.
The company's records, however, shall show that such investments are part of
the company;

(7) Delegate its investment powers to investment
managers of the company to expedite the purchase and sale of securities. The
purchase or sale of securities by these managers shall be in the name selected
by the board. The authority of these managers to purchase or sell securities for
the company shall be evidenced by written authority executed by the
administrator. The board shall require these managers to keep it currently
informed as to the nature and amount of the investments made for the company by
them. The board may enter into appropriate agreements with these managers
setting forth their investment powers and limitations. The board may terminate
the services of these managers. These managers shall be subject to the board's
instructions;

(8) Pay taxes or assessments that are assessed
against the company;

(9) Require any applicant or policyholder to furnish
the board with such information necessary for the company's administration; and

(10) Delegate its authority to the administrator or
any authorized representative to maintain any legal proceedings necessary to
protect the company or the directors or to secure payment due to the company.
In connection with this delegation, the board or the administrator or their
representative may compromise, settle, or release claims on behalf of or
against the company or the board. [L 1996, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next